Utah statutes.
17-30-23.   Severability of provisions -- Duty of commission to provide for
unspecified activities.
If any section or provision of this act is declared unconstitutional or void,
the fact of such holding shall in no wise affect those sections and provisions
not held unconstitutional or void and which can be retained in effect without
the provision declared unconstitutional and void, and it shall be the duty of
the merit service commission to provide by rule for the operation and
functioning of any activity within the purpose and spirit of the act which may
be or may become necessary and proper and which is not specifically provided
hereby.
